Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1145
District; failure to carry out responsibilities; effect.

If after a hearing held pursuant to section 46-1144 the director determines that the district is not carrying out its responsibilities under the Nebraska Chemigation Act, the powers and duties of the district set out in the act shall vest in the department for a period of twelve months. All application fees shall be payable to the department during such twelve-month period and shall be placed in the Chemigation Costs Fund. Each district which has lost its powers and duties to the department shall, at least thirty days prior to the end of any such twelve-month period, inform the director as to whether it is now able to carry out its responsibilities under the Nebraska Chemigation Act or the reasons why it will continue to be unable to meet such responsibilities. If the district is unable to meet its responsibilities, the department may continue to perform the powers and duties required of the district for an additional twelve-month period.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 45.